Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 19
TRANSACTIONS INVOLVING LICENSED HOSPITALS

Law reviews:

For article, "Attorney General Review of Asset Transfers by Nonprofit Hospitals", see 28

C

olo. Law. 37 (Feb. 1999).

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 NONPROFIT TO NONPROFIT TRANSACTIONS

PART 3 FOR-PROFIT TO FOR-PROFIT TRANSACTIONS

PART 4 NONPROFIT TO FOR-PROFIT TRANSACTIONS